hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/special/spechyph-utf8-uk.tex
\patterns{                                                      
2в'3
2м'3
2н'3
2р'3
6'
.б'8
.в'8
.д'8
.з'8
.м'8
.н'8
.п'8
.р'8 
.т'8
.ф'8
.ш'8
.вб6'6
.вв6'6 
.вм6'6
.вп6'6
.зв6'6
.сп6'6
.бе4з'3
.від'3
неві4д'3
.пере4д'3
.під'3
.ро4з'3
.чере4з'3
ооб'3
об'3
од'3
на4д'3
до3в'4є
за3в'4є
зі3в'4є
обі3в'4є
по3в'4є
уі3в'4є
з3в'4я
по3в'4я
від3в'4я
за3в'4я
зі3в'4я
на3в'4я
непо3в'4я
об3в'4я
при3в'4я
під3в'4я
у3в'4я
з3м'4я
зі3м'4я
у3м'4я
в3м'4я
но3м'4я
за3м'4я
на3м'4я
об3м'4я
пере3м'4я
по3м'4я
при3м'4я
піді3м'4я
су3м'4я
до3в'4ю
за3в'4ю
зі3в'4ю
на3в'4ю
по3в'4ю
уі3в'4ю
інтер3в'4ю
3з4в4'яз
3о4б'єдн
3о4б'єкт
'ї4в
'ї4з
'ї4д
'ї4ж
'ї4л
'ї4м
'ї4с
'ї4х
б'4єть
3в'4яз
3з'4ясо
3м'4якш
3м'4ят
ро4з'5єдн
з'4єдн
з'я4в
роз'я4сн
роз'я4р
}
